District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2927

Filing false data with Commission; disclosure of applicant’s identity number; impersonation of applicant

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.